Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.190

Additional area may be added to district.

After a park and recreation district has been organized, an additional area may be added by the same procedure within the proposed additional area as is provided herein for the organization of a park and recreation district, except that no first commissioners shall be nominated by the board of county commissioners or elected, and all electors within both the organized park and recreation district and the proposed additional territory shall vote upon the proposition for enlargement.

[ 1969 c 26 s 6; 1967 c 63 s 6; 1963 c 4 s 36.69.190. Prior: 1961 c 272 s 6; 1959 c 304 s 7; 1957 c 58 s 20.]